Montana, session 2025, SB398.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 3-6-103, MCA, is amended to read:
"3-6-103. Jurisdiction. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2), the municipal court has jurisdiction
coordinate and coextensive with the justices' courts of the county where the city is located and has exclusive
original jurisdiction of all civil and criminal actions and proceedings provided for in 3-11-103.
(2) The municipal court has original jurisdiction of the following proceedings:
(a) actions for the collection of money due to the city or from the city to any person when the
amount sought, exclusive of interest and costs, does not exceed $25,000 $50,000;
(b) when the amount claimed, exclusive of costs, does not exceed $25,000 $50,000, actions for:
(i) the breach of an official bond given by a city officer;
(ii) the breach of any contract when the city is a party or is in any way interested;
(iii) damages when the city is a party or is in any way interested;
(iv) the enforcement of forfeited recognizances given to, for the benefit of, or on behalf of the city;
and
(v) collections on bonds given upon an appeal taken from the judgment of the court in any action
mentioned in subsections (2)(b)(i) through (2)(b)(iv); and
(c) actions for the recovery of personal property belonging to the city when the value of the
property, exclusive of the damages for taking or detention, does not exceed $25,000 $50,000.
(3) Municipal courts have concurrent jurisdiction with the district court in actions arising under Title
70, chapters 24 through 27.
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 398
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 398
(4) Applications for search warrants and complaints charging the commission of a felony may be
filed in municipal court. The municipal court judge has the same jurisdiction and responsibility as a justice of the
peace, including holding preliminary hearings. The city attorney may initiate proceedings charging a felony if the
offense was committed within the city limits, but the county attorney shall take charge of the action if an
information is filed in district court."
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 398
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
SB 398, originated in the Senate.
___________________________________________
Secretary of the Senate
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

SENATE BILL NO. 398
INTRODUCED BY M. YAKAWICH
AN ACT INCREASING THE CAP FOR COLLECTIONS RELATED TO ACTIONS BROUGHT BEFORE A
MUNICIPAL COURT; AND AMENDING SECTION 3-6-103, MCA.”